Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1735
Classified service; discrimination; prohibited.

No person in the classified service or seeking admission thereto shall be appointed, reduced, or removed, or in any way favored or discriminated against because of his political, racial, or religious opinions or affiliations, except for membership in any organization which has advocated or does advocate the overthrow of the government of the United States or this state by force or violence.

Laws 1969, c. 140, § 15, p. 647.